West Virginia, session 2025, HB2398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-52. Penalty for convention of states delegate who deviates from authority. Any delegate who attends a convention of states to modify the United States Constitution and who exceeds his or her authority at the convention is subject to mandatory, immediate recall, a $100,000 to $500,000 fine, and up to 10 years in prison. Additionally, the delegate's vote or votes shall be void.